zh-CN: 擦拭包装: 塑料管; 补充装; 软包装; 旅行装; 其他
pl: Opakowanie chusteczek nawilżanych: Plastikowa wanna; Opakowanie uzupełniające; Opakowanie miękkie; Rozmiar podróżny; Inne
en: Wipe packaging: Plastic tub; Refill pack; Soft pack; Travel size; Other
fi: Pyyheliinapakkaus: Muovinen purkki; Täyttöpakkaus; Pehmeä pakkaus; Matkakoko; Muu
ru: Упаковка салфеток: Пластиковая туба; Сменный блок; Мягкая упаковка; Компактный размер; Другое
fr: Emballage de lingettes: Barquette en plastique; Recharge; Emballage souple; Format voyage; Autre
ro-RO: Ambalaj șervețele: Tub de plastic; Pachet de rezervă; Ambalaj moale; Dimensiune de voiaj; Altele
nl: Verpakking doekjes: Kunststof kuipje; Navulpakket; Softpack; Reisgrootte; Andere
ja: おしりふきのパッケージ: プラスチックタブ; つめかえ用パック; 柔らかい紙; トラベルサイズ; その他
ko: 물티슈 패키지: 플라스틱 통; 리필 팩; 소프트 팩; 여행용 크기; 기타
nb: Emballasje på servietter: Plastbeger; Påfyllingspakke; Myk pakke; Reisestørrelse; Annet
hu: Törlőkendő csomagolása: Műanyag kád; Utántöltő csomag; Puha csomag; Utazási méret; Egyéb
de: Verpackung der Feuchttücher: Plastikwanne; Nachfüllpackung; Weichpackung; Reisegröße; Sonstiges
cs: Balení vlhčených ubrousků: Plastová vanička; Náhradní náplň; Měkké balení; Cestovní velikost; Jiné
bg-BG: Опаковка за кърпички: Пластмасова кутия; Пакет за зареждане; Мека опаковка; Размер за пътуване; Други
hr-HR: Pakiranje maramica: Plastična tuba; Pakiranje punjenja; Mekano pakiranje; Putna veličina; Ostalo
th: บรรจุภัณฑ์ทิชชู่เปียก: หลอดพลาสติก; แพ็คสำหรับเติมใหม่; ซอฟท์แพ็ค; ขนาดพกพา; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Embalaža robčkov: Plastična tuba; Paket za ponovno polnjenje; Mehko pakiranje; Potovalna velikost; Drugo
sv: Servettförpackning: Plasttub; Påfyllningsförpackning; Mjuk packning; Resestorlek; Övrigt
es: Embalaje de toallitas húmedas: Tina de plástico; Recarga; Paquete flexible; Tamaño de viaje; Otros
pt-PT: Embalagem de toalhetes: Tubo de plástico; Pacote de recarga; Pacote maleável; Tamanho de viagem; Outro
zh-TW: 紙巾包材: 塑膠桶; 補充包; 軟件包; 便攜式尺寸; 其他
da: Kludemballage: Plastbalje; Genopfyldningspakke; Blød pakke; Rejsestørrelse; Andet
pt-BR: Embalagem do lencinho: Banheira de plástico; Pacotes de refil; Embalagem; Tamanho para viagem; Outro
it: Imballaggio delle salviette: Vaschetta di plastica; Confezione di ricarica; Confezione morbida; Formato da viaggio; Altro
lt-LT: Servetėlių pakuotė: Plastikinė tūbelė; Papildymo pakuotė; Mnkšta pakuotė; Kelioninis dydis; Kita
sk-SK: Obal vlhčených utierok: Plastová vaňa; Plniace balenie; Mäkké balenie; Cestovná veľkosť; Iné
vi: Lau bao bì: Hộp nhựa; Gói làm đầy; Gói mềm; Cỡ nhỏ gọn; Khác
el: Συσκευασία υγρών μαντηλιών: Πλαστική μπανιέρα; Συσκευασία αναπλήρωσης; Μαλακό πακέτο; Μέγεθος ταξιδίου; Άλλο
tr: Mendil ambalajı: Plastik küvet; Doldurulabilir paket; Yumuşak paket; Seyahat boyu; Diğer